Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1660XS (6) 91 lh/ko S.F. 324 DIVISION I 1 IOWA FAMILY PLANNING NETWORK ââ MEDICAID STATE PLAN AMENDMENT 2 Section 1. IOWA FAMILY PLANNING NETWORK ââ MEDICAID STATE 3 PLAN AMENDMENT. 4 1. The department of health and human services shall submit 5 a Medicaid state plan amendment to the centers for Medicare 6 and Medicaid services of the United States department of 7 health and human services for approval to establish the Iowa 8 family planning network with the same benefits, eligibility 9 requirements, and other provisions included in the Medicaid 10 Iowa family planning network waiver as approved by the centers 11 for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States 12 department of health and human services in effect on June 30, 13 2017. 14 2. Subject to an appropriation by the general assembly for 15 the purposes of this section, the department of health and 16 human services shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 17 allow additional moneys to be allocated to locations identified 18 as having increased rates of sexually transmitted infections to 19 increase awareness of the Iowa family planning network and the 20 networkâs services. 21 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 22 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23 DIVISION II 24 REPEAL OF STATE FAMILY PLANNING SERVICES PROGRAM 25 Sec. 3. REPEAL. Section 217.41B, Code 2025, is repealed. 26 Sec. 4. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. 27 1. The following takes effect upon receipt of approval by 28 the department of health and human services from the centers 29 for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United States 30 department of health and human services of the Medicaid state 31 plan amendment submitted pursuant to division I of this Act to 32 establish the Iowa family planning network: the section of 33 this division of this Act repealing section 217.41B, Code 2025. 34 2. Upon the receipt of approval as described in subsection 35 -1- LSB 1660XS (6) 91 lh/ko 1/ 2 S.F. 324 1, the department of health and human services shall notify the 1 Code editor of the date of receipt of the approval. 2